src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
================================================== !
The Low German morphophonological/twolc rules file 
================================================== !

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-nds/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

strong verb class 1 1st part
strong verb class 1 2nd part
strong verb class 2a 1st part
strong verb class 2a 2nd part
strong verb class 2b 1st part
strong verb class 2b 2nd part
strong verb class 3a 
strong verb class 3bc
strong verb class 4a 1st part
strong verb class 4ab 2nd part
strong verb class 4b 1st part
strong verb class 4c 1st part
strong verb class 4c 2nd part 
strong verb class 5a 1st part 
strong verb class 5ab 2nd part
strong verb class 5b 1st part

TRIGGERS
* %^CC2C:0  for Deleting second consonant in orthographic geminate
* %^VV2V:0  for Orthographic vowel deletion in open syllable
* %^IUML:0  for i-umlaut
* %^UUML:0  for u-umlaut
* %^ABL1NL:0  for non-lengthened ablaut grade 1 in class 4 and 5 in some southern dialects, ABL1 = ablaut grade 1, NL = non-lengthened
* %^ABL1S:0  for shortened ablaut grade 1 in 2nd and 3rd sg. of present tense, S = shortened
* %^ABL2:0  for ablaut grade 2 in preterite, ABL2 = ablaut grade 2
* %^ABL2W:0  for specific preterite forms in Westphalian dialects, W = Westphalian
* %^ABL2U:0  for irregular umlaut of ablaut grade 2 in class 4a,b and 5, U = (irregular) umlaut
* %^ABL3:0  for long ablaut grade 3 in perfect participle
* %^ABL3NL:0  for short ablaut grade 3 in some southern dialects, NL = non-lengthened 

**Deleting s before suffix -st**

* *leas%>st*
* *lea0%>st*

* ★*leas%>st* (is not standard language)
* ★*leas%>st* (is not standard language)

**Deleting t before suffix -t**

* *acht%>t*
* *ach0%>t*

* ★*acht%>t* (is not standard language)
* ★*acht%>t* (is not standard language)

**Orthographic vowel deletion in open syllable**

maken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
* *maak%^VV2V%>e*
* *ma0k0%>e*

* ★*maak%^VV2V%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*maak0%>e* (is not standard language)

**Orthographic consonant deletion in closed syllable**

tellen+V+PrfPrc 
* *tell%^CC2C>d*
* *tel00%>d*

* ★*tell%^CC2C>d* (is not standard language)
* ★*tell0%>d* (is not standard language)

**I-umlaut for short vowels in closed syllable or long vowels in open syllable** 

holt+N+Pl+Nom: **muorra/puu/wood**
* *holt%^IUML%>er*
* *hölt0%>er*

* ★*holt%^IUML%>er* (is not standard language)
* ★*holt0%>er* (is not standard language)

broder+N+Pl+Nom: **viellja/veli/brother**
* *broder%^IUML%>s*
* *bröder0%>s*

* ★*broder%^IUML%>s* (is not standard language)
* ★*broder0%>s* (is not standard language)

woord+N+Pl+Nom: **sátni/sana/word**
* *woord%^IUML%>e*
* *wöörd0%>e*

* ★*woord%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*woord0%>e* (is not standard language)

vuust+N+Pl+Nom: **čorbma/nyrkki/fist**
* *vuust%^IUML%>e*
* *vüüst0%>e*

* ★*vuust%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*vuust0%>e* (is not standard language)

**I-umlaut for å ** 

**Double marking of i-umlaut for å** 

råd+N+Pl+Nom: **ráđđi/neuvo/council**
* *r%{åöä%}%{0äö%}d%^IUML%>e*
* *röäd0%>e*

* ★*r%{åöä%}%{0äö%}d%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*rö%{0äö%}d0%>e* (is not standard language)

* ★*r%{åöä%}%{0äö%}d%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*r%{åöä%}%{0äö%}d0%>e* (is not standard language)

daal+N+Pl+Nom: **leahki/laakso/valley**
* *daal%^VV2V%^IUML%>er*
* *dä0l00%>er*

* ★*daal%^VV2V%^IUML%>er* (is not standard language)
* ★*da0l00%>er* (is not standard language)

book+N+Pl+Nom: **girji/kirja/book**
* *book%^VV2V%^IUML%>er*
* *bö0k00%>er*

* ★*book%^VV2V%^IUML%>er* (is not standard language)
* ★*bo0k00%>er* (is not standard language)

huus+N+Pl+Nom: **viessu/talo/house**
* *huus%^VV2V%^IUML%>e*
* *hü0s00%>e*

* ★*huus%^VV2V%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*hu0s00%>e* (is not standard language)

**Double marking of umlaut for graphemes consisting of two different letters, ending in a:ä**

sak+N+Pl+Nom: **seahkka/pussi/bag**
* *sakk%^IUML%>e*
* *säkk0%>e*

* ★*sakk%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*sakk0%>e* (is not standard language)

slag+N+Pl+NOM: **časkin/lyönti/hit**
* *slag%^IUML%>e*
* *släg0%>e*

* ★*slag%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*slag0%>e* (is not standard language)

maagd+N+Pl+Nom: **biigá/piika/maid**
* *maagd%^IUML%>e*
* *määgd0%>e*

* ★*maagd%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*maagd0%>e* (is not standard language)

* ★*maagd%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*mäagd0%>e* (is not standard language)

broak+N+Pl+Nom: **doadjin/katkaisu/break**
* *broak%^IUML%>e*
* *bröäk0%>e*

* ★*broak%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*broak0%>e* (is not standard language)

* ★*broak%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*bröak0%>e* (is not standard language)

**Double marking of umlaut for graphemes consisting of two different letters, ending in u:y**

**Double marking of umlaut for graphemes consisting of two different letters, ending in u:ü**
busk+N+Pl+Nom: **miestta/pensas/bush**
* *busk%^IUML%>e*
* *büsk0%>e*

* ★*busk%^IUML%>e* (is not standard language)
* ★*busk0%>e* (is not standard language)

**Short ablaut grade 1 in class 1  %{eiØ%}:i**

**Second part of short ablaut grade 1 in class 1** 

ryden+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: **riidet/ratsastaa/ride**
* *r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL1S%>t*
* *r0id0%>t*

* ★*r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL1S%>t* (is not standard language)
* ★*ri{yaØ%}d0%>t* (is not standard language)

* ★*r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL1S%>t* (is not standard language)
* ★*r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d0%>t* (is not standard language)

**Short ablaut grade 1 in class 2a %{eouü%}:ü**

**Second part of short ablaut grade 1 in class 2a** 

beden+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: **bivdit/pyytää/ask**
* *b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL1S%>t*
* *bü0d0%>t*

**Short ablaut grade 1 in class 2b  %{uüo%}:ü**

**Second part of short ablaut grade 1 in class 2b**

krupen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: **čákŋat/ryömiä/creep**
* *kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL1S%>t*
* *krü0p0%>t*

**Short ablaut grade 1 in class 4a %{iaeo%}:i**

**Second part of short ablaut grade 1 in class 4a+b and 5a+b**

niamen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: **váldit/ottaa/take**
* *n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL1S%>t*
* *ni0mØ%>t*

**Short ablaut grade 1 in class 4b %{eiao%}:i **

dreapen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: **deaivvadit/tavata/meet**
* *dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL1S%>t*
* *dri0pØ%>t*

**Short ablaut grade 1 in class 4c %{eio%}:i**

**Second part of short ablaut grade 1 in class 4c**

spreaken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: **hupmat/puhua/speak**
* *spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k%^ABL1S%>t*
* *spri0k0%>t*

**Short ablaut grade 1 in class 5a %{iae%}:i**

giaven+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: **addit/antaa/give**
* *g%{iae%}%{aeØ%}v%^ABL1S%>t*
* *gi0v0%>t*

**Short ablaut grade 1 in class 5b**

steaken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: **čugget/pistää/stab**
* *st%{eia%}%{aeØ%}k%^ABL1S%>t*
* *sti0k0%>t*

**Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 1 %{eiØ%}:e**

**Second part of ablaut grade 2 in class 1**

ryden+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **riidet/ratsastaa/ride**
* *r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL2*
* *reyd0*

* ★*r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL2* (is not standard language)
* ★*r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d0* (is not standard language)

* ★*r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL2* (is not standard language)
* ★*re%{yaØ%}d0* (is not standard language)

**Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 2a **

**Second part of ablaut grade 2 in class 2a **

beden+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **bivdit/pyytää/ask**
* *b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL2*
* *boud0*

* ★*b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL2* (is not standard language)
* ★*b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d0* (is not standard language)

* ★*b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL2* (is not standard language)
* ★*bo%{Øeua%}d0* (is not standard language)

**Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 2b**

**Second part of ablaut grade 2 in class 2b**

krupen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **čákŋat/ryömiä/creep**
* *kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2*
* *kroup0*

* ★*kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2* (is not standard language)
* ★*kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p0* (is not standard language)

* ★*kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2* (is not standard language)
* ★*kro%{uaØ%}p0* (is not standard language)

**Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 3a**

drinken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **juhkat/juoda/drink**
* *dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL2*
* *drunk0*

* ★*dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL2* (is not standard language)
* ★*dr%{iua%}nk0* (is not standard language)

drinken+V+PrfPrt: **juhkat/juoda/drink**
* *dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL3%>en*
* *drunk0%>en*

* ★*dr%{iua%}nk%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*dr%{iua%}nk0%>en* (is not standard language)

**Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 3b and 3c**

helpen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **veahkehit/auttaa/help**
* *h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL2*
* *holp0*

* ★*h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL2* (is not standard language)
* ★*h%{eoa%}lp0* (is not standard language)

helpen+V+PrfPrt: **veahkehit/auttaa/help**
* *h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL3%>en*
* *holp0%>en*

* ★*h%{eoa%}lp%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*h%{eoa%}lp0%>en* (is not standard language)

**Ablaut grade 2 in class 4a (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)**
**Second part of ablaut grade 2 in class 4a+b+c and 5a+b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)**

niamen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **váldit/ottaa/take**
* *n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL2U*
* *naem0*

* ★*n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL2U* (is not standard language)
* ★*n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m0* (is not standard language)

* ★*n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL2U* (is not standard language)
* ★*na%{aeØ%}m0* (is not standard language)

**Ablaut grade 2 in class 4b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)**

dreapen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **deaivvadit/tavata/meet**
* *dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL2U*
* *draep0*

**Ablaut grade 2 and 3 in class 4c**
**Second part of ablaut grade 2 in class 4c**

spreaken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **hupmat/puhua/speak**
* *spr%{eio%}%{aØo%}k%^ABL2*
* *sprook0*

**Ablaut grade 2 in class 5a (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)**

giaven+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **addit/antaa/give**
* *g%{iae%}%{aeØ%}v%^ABL2U*
* *gaev0%>t*

**Ablaut grade 2 in class 5b (with generalised old conjunctive for northern and northeastern dialects)**

steaken+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **čugget/pistää/stab**
* *st%{eia%}%{aeØ%}k%^ABL2U*
* *staek0*

**Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 1**

ryden+V+PrfPrc: **riidet/ratsastaa/ride**
* *r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL3%>en*
* *read0%>en*

* ★*r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d0%>en* (is not standard language)

* ★*r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*re%{yaØ%}d0%>en* (is not standard language)

**Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 2a **

beden+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **bivdit/pyytää/ask**
* *b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL3%>en*
* *boad0%>en*

* ★*b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d0%>en* (is not standard language)

* ★*b%{eouü%}%{Øeua%}d%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*bo%{Øeua%}d0%>en* (is not standard language)

**Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 2b**

krupen+V+PrfPrc: **čákŋat/ryömiä/creep**
* *kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL3%>en*
* *kroap0%>en*

* ★*kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p0%>en* (is not standard language)

* ★*kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*kro%{uaØ%}p0%>en* (is not standard language)

* ★*kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL2* (is not standard language)
* ★*kro%{uaØ%}p0* (is not standard language)

**Ablaut grade 3 in class 4a+b**

**Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 4a**

niamen+V+PrfPrt: **váldit/ottaa/take**
* *n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL3%>en*
* *noam0%>en*

* ★*n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m0%>en* (is not standard language)

* ★*n%{iaeo%}%{aeØ%}m%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*na%{aeØ%}m0%>en* (is not standard language)

**Ablaut grade 3 in class 4b**

dreapen+V+PrfPrt: **deaivvadit/tavata/meet**
* *dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL3%>en*
* *droap0%>en*

* ★*dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p0%>en* (is not standard language)

* ★*dr%{eiao%}%{aeØ%}p%^ABL3%>en* (is not standard language)
* ★*dro%{aeØ%}p0%>en* (is not standard language)

**Second part of ablaut grade 3 in class 4c**
